zh-CN: 压力锅手柄样式: 辅助手柄; 锅盖旋钮; 长手柄; 侧手柄; 通用; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta ručke ekspres lonca: Pomoćna ručka; Ručka poklopca; Duga ručka; Bočna ručka; Univerzalno; Ostalo
sv: Tryckkokare användarnamn typ: Hjälpanvändarnamn; Lockknopp; Långt handtag; Sidohandtag; Universell; Övrigt
ja: 圧力鍋のハンドルタイプ: 補助ハンドル; ふたノブ; 長柄; サイドハンドル; ユニバーサル; その他
ru: Тип ручки скороварки: Вспомогательная рукоятка; Ручка крышки; Длинная ручка; Боковая ручка; Универсальная; Другое
tr: Düdüklü tencere kulp tipi: Yardımcı tutma kolu; Kapak topuzu; Uzun sap; Yan sap; Evrensel; Diğer
el: Τύπος λαβής χύτρας ταχύτητας: Βοηθητική λαβή; Κουμπί καπακιού; Μακριά λαβή; Πλαϊνή λαβή; Universal; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de mâner pentru oala sub presiune: Mâner auxiliar; Butonul capacului; Mâner lung; Mâner lateral; Universal; Altele
pl: Typ uchwytu szybkowaru: Uchwyt pomocniczy; Gałka pokrywy; Długi uchwyt; Uchwyt boczny; Uniwersalne; Inne
fr: Type de poignée de l’autocuiseur: Poignée auxiliaire; Bouton du couvercle; Poignée longue; Poignée d'attache; Universel; Autre
cs: Typ rukojeti tlakového hrnce: Pomocná rukojeť; Úchyt poklice; Dlouhá rukojeť; Boční rukojeť; Univerzální; Jiné
nb: Type trykkoker-håndtak: Hjelpereferanse; Lokkhåndtak; Langt håndtak; Sidehåndtak; Universal; Annet
th: ประเภทด้ามจับหม้อแรงดัน: ด้ามจับเสริม; ปุ่มจับฝาปิด; แฮนเดิลแบบยาว; แฮนเดิลด้านข้าง; สากล; อื่นๆ
de: Typ des Schnellkochtopf-Griffs: Hilfsgriff; Deckelknopf; Langer Griff; Seitengriff; Universell; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Slėginio puodo rankenos tipas: Pagalbinė rankena; Dangtelio rankenėlė; Ilga rankena; Šoninė rankena; Universalus; Kita
bg-BG: Тип дръжка на тенджера под налягане: Допълнителна дръжка; Дръжка на капака; Дълга дръжка; Странична дръжка; Универсално; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de pega da panela de pressão: Pega auxiliar; Botão da tampa; Alça longa; Pega lateral; Universal; Outro
vi: Loại tay cầm nồi áp suất: Tay cầm phụ; Núm nắp nồi; Tay cầm dài; Tay cầm phụ; Phổ dụng; Khác
fi: Painekattilan kahvatyyppi: Apukahva; Kannen nuppi; Pitkä kahva; Sivukahva; Yleismallinen; Muu
ko: 압력솥 손잡이 유형: 보조 핸들; 뚜껑 손잡이; 긴 손잡이; 사이드 핸들; 범용; 기타
it: Tipo di manico della pentola a pressione: handleausiliaria; Pomello del coperchio; Manico lungo; Maniglia laterale; Universale; Altro
da: Trykkogers håndtag: Ekstra håndtag; Lågknap; Langt håndtag; Sidehåndtag; Universal; Andet
sk-SK: Typ rukoväte tlakového hrnca: Pomocná rukoväť; Rukoväť na veku; Dlhá rukoväť; Bočná rukoväť; Univerzálna; Iné
zh-TW: 壓力鍋把手類型: 輔助把手; 蓋子旋鈕; 長手把; 側邊把手; 通用; 其他
nl: Type handgreep voor snelkookpan: Hulphandgreep; Dekselknop; Lang handvat; Zijhandgreep; Universeel; Overig
es: Tipo de mango de olla a presión: Asa auxiliar; Perilla de la tapa; Asa larga; Asa lateral; Universal; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de alça da panela de pressão: Empunhadura auxiliar; Botão de tampa; Cabo longo; Alça lateral; Universal; Outro
en: Pressure cooker handle type: Auxiliary handle; Lid knob; Long handle; Side handle; Universal; Other
hu: A kukta fogantyújának típusa: Segédfogantyú; Fedélgomb; Hosszú fogantyú; Oldalsó fogantyú; Általános; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta ročaja ekonom lonca: Pomožni ročaj; Gumb pokrova; Dolg ročaj; Stranski ročaj; Univerzalno; Drugi